Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska39-846
State Aid Bridge Fund; created; use; investment.

In order to expedite the replacement of deficient bridges, the State Aid Bridge Fund is hereby created to provide assistance to counties for replacement of bridges. Any money in the fund available for investment shall be invested by the state investment officer pursuant to the Nebraska Capital Expansion Act and the Nebraska State Funds Investment Act.

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. VII, art. III, § 1, p. 815;

C.S.1922, § 8356;

C.S.1929, § 39-1501;

R.S.1943, § 39-846;

Laws 1973, LB 87, § 1;

Laws 1995, LB 7, § 35.

Nebraska Capital Expansion Act, see section 72-1269.

Nebraska State Funds Investment Act, see section 72-1260.

Right of contribution from state for portion of cost of bridge was limited by appropriation for state aid bridge fund. Scotts Bluff County v. State, 133 Neb. 508, 276 N.W. 185 (1937).

One county cannot compel another to contribute to cost of state aid bridge over boundary line stream between the two counties unless notice has been given to other county of intention to build bridge and opportunity given to participate in its construction. Buffalo County v. Phelps County, 129 Neb. 268, 261 N.W. 360 (1935).